language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0274 Y 54
SFX 0274 ć sć .
SFX 0274 ć tli .
SFX 0274 ć tu .
SFX 0274 ć tł .
SFX 0274 ć tła .
SFX 0274 ć tłe .
SFX 0274 ć tło .
SFX 0274 ć tłoj .
SFX 0274 ć tši .
SFX 0274 ć će .
SFX 0274 ć ćech .
SFX 0274 ć ćechmoj .
SFX 0274 ć ćechmy .
SFX 0274 ć ćechu .
SFX 0274 ć ćemoj .
SFX 0274 ć ćemy .
SFX 0274 ć ćena .
SFX 0274 ć ćenaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćene .
SFX 0274 ć ćeneho .
SFX 0274 ć ćenej .
SFX 0274 ć ćeneje .
SFX 0274 ć ćeneju .
SFX 0274 ć ćenemu .
SFX 0274 ć ćeni .
SFX 0274 ć ćenja .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjach .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjam .
SFX 0274 ć ćenje .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjemi .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjom .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjomaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćenjow .
SFX 0274 ć ćenju .
SFX 0274 ć ćenoh .
SFX 0274 ć ćenom .
SFX 0274 ć ćenu .
SFX 0274 ć ćeny .
SFX 0274 ć ćenych .
SFX 0274 ć ćenym .
SFX 0274 ć ćenymaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćenymi .
SFX 0274 ć ćetaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćetej .
SFX 0274 ć ćeće .
SFX 0274 ć ćeš .
SFX 0274 ć ćeštaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćeštej .
SFX 0274 ć ćešće .
SFX 0274 ć ćmoj .
SFX 0274 ć ćmy .
SFX 0274 ć ćtaj .
SFX 0274 ć ćtej .
SFX 0274 ć ćće .

SFX 0275 Y 55
SFX 0275 ž za .
SFX 0275 ž zach .
SFX 0275 ž zachmoj .
SFX 0275 ž zachmy .
SFX 0275 ž zachu .
SFX 0275 ž zali .
SFX 0275 ž zana .
SFX 0275 ž zanaj .
SFX 0275 ž zane .
SFX 0275 ž zaneho .
SFX 0275 ž zanej .
SFX 0275 ž zaneje .
SFX 0275 ž zaneju .
SFX 0275 ž zanemu .
SFX 0275 ž zani .
SFX 0275 ž zanja .
SFX 0275 ž zanjach .
SFX 0275 ž zanjam .
SFX 0275 ž zanje .
SFX 0275 ž zanjemi .
SFX 0275 ž zanjom .
SFX 0275 ž zanjomaj .
SFX 0275 ž zanjow .
SFX 0275 ž zanju .
SFX 0275 ž zanoh .
SFX 0275 ž zanom .
SFX 0275 ž zanu .
SFX 0275 ž zany .
SFX 0275 ž zanych .
SFX 0275 ž zanym .
SFX 0275 ž zanymaj .
SFX 0275 ž zanymi .
SFX 0275 ž zawši .
SFX 0275 ž zać .
SFX 0275 ž zał .
SFX 0275 ž zała .
SFX 0275 ž załe .
SFX 0275 ž zało .
SFX 0275 ž załoj .
SFX 0275 ž zaštaj .
SFX 0275 ž zaštej .
SFX 0275 ž zašće .
SFX 0275 ž že .
SFX 0275 ž žemoj .
SFX 0275 ž žemy .
SFX 0275 ž žetaj .
SFX 0275 ž žetej .
SFX 0275 ž žeće .
SFX 0275 ž žeš .
SFX 0275 ž žmoj .
SFX 0275 ž žmy .
SFX 0275 ž žtaj .
SFX 0275 ž žtej .
SFX 0275 ž žu .
SFX 0275 ž žće .

SFX 0276 Y 57
SFX 0276 0 c .
SFX 0276 0 ch .
SFX 0276 0 chmoj .
SFX 0276 0 chmy .
SFX 0276 0 chu .
SFX 0276 0 hli .
SFX 0276 0 hł .
SFX 0276 0 hła .
SFX 0276 0 hłe .
SFX 0276 0 hło .
SFX 0276 0 hłoj .
SFX 0276 0 wši .
SFX 0276 0 štaj .
SFX 0276 0 štej .
SFX 0276 0 šće .
SFX 0276 0 ž .
SFX 0276 0 ža .
SFX 0276 0 že .
SFX 0276 0 žeja .
SFX 0276 0 žemoj .
SFX 0276 0 žemy .
SFX 0276 0 žena .
SFX 0276 0 ženaj .
SFX 0276 0 žene .
SFX 0276 0 ženeho .
SFX 0276 0 ženej .
SFX 0276 0 ženeje .
SFX 0276 0 ženeju .
SFX 0276 0 ženemu .
SFX 0276 0 ženi .
SFX 0276 0 ženja .
SFX 0276 0 ženjach .
SFX 0276 0 ženjam .
SFX 0276 0 ženje .
SFX 0276 0 ženjemi .
SFX 0276 0 ženjom .
SFX 0276 0 ženjomaj .
SFX 0276 0 ženjow .
SFX 0276 0 ženju .
SFX 0276 0 ženoh .
SFX 0276 0 ženom .
SFX 0276 0 ženu .
SFX 0276 0 ženy .
SFX 0276 0 ženych .
SFX 0276 0 ženym .
SFX 0276 0 ženymaj .
SFX 0276 0 ženymi .
SFX 0276 0 žetaj .
SFX 0276 0 žetej .
SFX 0276 0 žeće .
SFX 0276 0 žeš .
SFX 0276 0 žmoj .
SFX 0276 0 žmy .
SFX 0276 0 žtaj .
SFX 0276 0 žtej .
SFX 0276 0 žu .
SFX 0276 0 žće .

SFX 0277 Y 65
SFX 0277 0 ch .
SFX 0277 0 chmoj .
SFX 0277 0 chmy .
SFX 0277 0 chu .
SFX 0277 0 dźa .
SFX 0277 0 dźana .
SFX 0277 0 dźanaj .
SFX 0277 0 dźane .
SFX 0277 0 dźaneho .
SFX 0277 0 dźanej .
SFX 0277 0 dźaneje .
SFX 0277 0 dźaneju .
SFX 0277 0 dźanemu .
SFX 0277 0 dźani .
SFX 0277 0 dźanoh .
SFX 0277 0 dźanom .
SFX 0277 0 dźanu .
SFX 0277 0 dźany .
SFX 0277 0 dźanych .
SFX 0277 0 dźanym .
SFX 0277 0 dźanymaj .
SFX 0277 0 dźanymi .
SFX 0277 0 dźawši .
SFX 0277 0 dźał .
SFX 0277 0 dźała .
SFX 0277 0 dźałe .
SFX 0277 0 dźało .
SFX 0277 0 dźałoj .
SFX 0277 0 dźeli .
SFX 0277 0 dźeni .
SFX 0277 0 dźenja .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjach .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjam .
SFX 0277 0 dźenje .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjemi .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjom .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjomaj .
SFX 0277 0 dźenjow .
SFX 0277 0 dźenju .
SFX 0277 0 li .
SFX 0277 0 m .
SFX 0277 0 moj .
SFX 0277 0 my .
SFX 0277 0 s .
SFX 0277 0 smoj .
SFX 0277 0 smy .
SFX 0277 0 staj .
SFX 0277 0 stej .
SFX 0277 0 sć .
SFX 0277 0 sće .
SFX 0277 0 z .
SFX 0277 0 zmoj .
SFX 0277 0 zmy .
SFX 0277 0 ztaj .
SFX 0277 0 ztej .
SFX 0277 0 zće .
SFX 0277 0 ł .
SFX 0277 0 ła .
SFX 0277 0 łe .
SFX 0277 0 ło .
SFX 0277 0 łoj .
SFX 0277 0 š .
SFX 0277 0 štaj .
SFX 0277 0 štej .
SFX 0277 0 šće .

SFX 0278 Y 55
SFX 0278 i imoj .
SFX 0278 i imy .
SFX 0278 i itaj .
SFX 0278 i itej .
SFX 0278 i iće .
SFX 0278 i je .
SFX 0278 i jemoj .
SFX 0278 i jemy .
SFX 0278 i jena .
SFX 0278 i jenaj .
SFX 0278 i jene .
SFX 0278 i jeneho .
SFX 0278 i jenej .
SFX 0278 i jeneje .
SFX 0278 i jeneju .
SFX 0278 i jenemu .
SFX 0278 i jeni .
SFX 0278 i jenja .
SFX 0278 i jenjach .
SFX 0278 i jenjam .
SFX 0278 i jenje .
SFX 0278 i jenjemi .
SFX 0278 i jenjom .
SFX 0278 i jenjomaj .
SFX 0278 i jenjow .
SFX 0278 i jenju .
SFX 0278 i jenoh .
SFX 0278 i jenom .
SFX 0278 i jenu .
SFX 0278 i jeny .
SFX 0278 i jenych .
SFX 0278 i jenym .
SFX 0278 i jenymaj .
SFX 0278 i jenymi .
SFX 0278 i jetaj .
SFX 0278 i jetej .
SFX 0278 i jeće .
SFX 0278 i ješ .
SFX 0278 i u .
SFX 0278 i ě .
SFX 0278 i ěch .
SFX 0278 i ěchmoj .
SFX 0278 i ěchmy .
SFX 0278 i ěchu .
SFX 0278 i ěli .
SFX 0278 i ěwši .
SFX 0278 i ěć .
SFX 0278 i ěł .
SFX 0278 i ěła .
SFX 0278 i ěłe .
SFX 0278 i ěło .
SFX 0278 i ěłoj .
SFX 0278 i ěštaj .
SFX 0278 i ěštej .
SFX 0278 i ěšće .

SFX 0279 Y 75
SFX 0279 uj owa ..
SFX 0279 uj owaca ..
SFX 0279 uj owacaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owace ..
SFX 0279 uj owaceho ..
SFX 0279 uj owacej ..
SFX 0279 uj owaceje ..
SFX 0279 uj owaceju ..
SFX 0279 uj owacemu ..
SFX 0279 uj owach ..
SFX 0279 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0279 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0279 uj owachu ..
SFX 0279 uj owacoh ..
SFX 0279 uj owacom ..
SFX 0279 uj owacu ..
SFX 0279 uj owacy ..
SFX 0279 uj owacych ..
SFX 0279 uj owacym ..
SFX 0279 uj owacymaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owacymi ..
SFX 0279 uj owali ..
SFX 0279 uj owana ..
SFX 0279 uj owanaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owane ..
SFX 0279 uj owaneho ..
SFX 0279 uj owanej ..
SFX 0279 uj owaneje ..
SFX 0279 uj owaneju ..
SFX 0279 uj owanemu ..
SFX 0279 uj owani ..
SFX 0279 uj owanja ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjach ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjam ..
SFX 0279 uj owanje ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjemi ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjom ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjomaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owanjow ..
SFX 0279 uj owanju ..
SFX 0279 uj owanoh ..
SFX 0279 uj owanom ..
SFX 0279 uj owanu ..
SFX 0279 uj owany ..
SFX 0279 uj owanych ..
SFX 0279 uj owanym ..
SFX 0279 uj owanymaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owanymi ..
SFX 0279 uj owawši ..
SFX 0279 uj ować ..
SFX 0279 uj ował ..
SFX 0279 uj owała ..
SFX 0279 uj owałe ..
SFX 0279 uj owało ..
SFX 0279 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0279 uj owaše ..
SFX 0279 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0279 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0279 uj owašće ..
SFX 0279 uj uja ..
SFX 0279 uj ujcy ..
SFX 0279 uj uje ..
SFX 0279 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0279 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0279 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0279 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0279 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0279 uj uješ ..
SFX 0279 uj ujmoj ..
SFX 0279 uj ujmy ..
SFX 0279 uj ujo ..
SFX 0279 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0279 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0279 uj uju ..
SFX 0279 uj ujće ..
