language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
dopleć/0274
dopokaž/0275
dopomó/0276
dopowě/0277
dopóžri/0278
dorěž/0275
nadreguluj/0279
nakašluj/0279
nakaž/0275
nalistuj/0279
namaž/0275
nanuzuj/0279
napawsuj/0279
napleć/0274
narěž/0275
nastapluj/0279
natrenuj/0279
nazwučuj/0279
njedopleć/0274
njedopokaž/0275
njedopomó/0276
njedopowě/0277
njedopóžri/0278
njedorěž/0275
njenaddozěruj/0279
njenadólčkuj/0279
njenakaž/0275
njenakřižuj/0279
njenamaž/0275
njenamoluj/0279
njenapakuj/0279
njenaplestruj/0279
njenapleć/0274
njenarěž/0275
njenastuduj/0279
njenawuhluj/0279
njepocynkuj/0279
njepodmurjuj/0279
njepodrěž/0275
njepokaž/0275
njepomaž/0275
njepomoluj/0279
njepomó/0276
njepopleć/0274
njepowotewri/0278
njepowě/0277
njepóžri/0278
njepřeblenduj/0279
njepřecyruj/0279
njepředformuj/0279
njepředisponuj/0279
njepředprogramuj/0279
njepředypkuj/0279
njepřefiluj/0279
njepřefunkcionuj/0279
njepřeiksuj/0279
njepřeknihuj/0279
njepřekopěruj/0279
njepřekupčikuj/0279
njepřelistuj/0279
njepřemaršěruj/0279
njepřemó/0276
njepřenocuj/0279
njepřepakuj/0279
njepřepjelchuj/0279
njepřepleć/0274
njepřepokaž/0275
njepřeporcionuj/0279
njepřepruwuj/0279
njepřerjaduj/0279
njepřerěž/0275
njepřestartuj/0279
njepřetrenuj/0279
njepřewojuj/0279
njepřezymuj/0279
njepřešaltuj/0279
njepřešuruj/0279
njepřikaž/0275
njepřikopluj/0279
njepřimontuj/0279
njepřinóžkuj/0279
njepřipleć/0274
njepřipokaž/0275
njepřipowě/0277
njepřipłachtakuj/0279
njepřirěž/0275
njepřitrenuj/0279
njepřištrykuj/0279
njerozcedluj/0279
njerozhałužkuj/0279
njerozkaž/0275
njerozkuskuj/0279
njerozmaž/0275
njerozmjeć/0274
njerozpječatuj/0279
njerozpleć/0274
njerozpokaž/0275
njerozrybuj/0279
njerozrěž/0275
njerozšrubuj/0279
njeskartuj/0279
njespleć/0274
njespóžri/0278
njewobdwěluj/0279
njewobmaž/0275
njewobmurjuj/0279
njewobodri/0278
njewobróštuj/0279
njewobrěž/0275
njewobzwukuj/0279
njewobšuruj/0279
njewomaž/0275
njewopleć/0274
njewopokaž/0275
njewopowě/0277
njewosazuj/0279
njewotblokuj/0279
njewotdušuj/0279
njewotewri/0278
njewotgratuj/0279
njewotheftuj/0279
njewothěbluj/0279
njewotkapsluj/0279
njewotkaž/0275
njewotkikruj/0279
njewotkopěruj/0279
njewotloduj/0279
njewotmilitarizuj/0279
njewotmjeć/0274
njewotmontuj/0279
njewotnaćuj/0279
njewotpjenkuj/0279
njewotpleć/0274
njewotpokaž/0275
njewotpomó/0276
njewotprancuj/0279
njewotrajtuj/0279
njewotromantizuj/0279
njewotrygluj/0279
njewotrěž/0275
njewotstepuj/0279
njewottaksěruj/0279
njewottrenuj/0279
njewotšajruj/0279
njewotšnóruj/0279
njewotšudruj/0279
njewotžaruj/0279
njewubagruj/0279
njewubilancuj/0279
njewucirkluj/0279
njewudiskutuj/0279
njewuformuluj/0279
njewuhandluj/0279
njewuknihuj/0279
njewuličbuj/0279
njewumaž/0275
njewumjeć/0274
njewumontuj/0279
njewumó/0276
njewupleć/0274
njewupokaž/0275
njewupolstruj/0279
njewupomó/0276
njewupowě/0277
njewuraděruj/0279
njewurězbuj/0279
njewurěž/0275
njewutrenuj/0279
njewuzbytkuj/0279
njewušlakuj/0279
njezabarikaduj/0279
njezacynkuj/0279
njezafispruj/0279
njezahorncuj/0279
njezakašćuj/0279
njezakaž/0275
njezakřižuj/0279
njezamajšuj/0279
njezamaž/0275
njezaparkuj/0279
njezapleć/0274
njezapokaž/0275
njezapowě/0277
njezaprograměruj/0279
njezarołuj/0279
njezarěž/0275
njezasazuj/0279
njezatrenuj/0279
njezaworštuj/0279
njezawri/0278
njezašpunduj/0279
njezběrokratizuj/0279
njezgwałtuj/0279
njezmaž/0275
njezmjeć/0274
njezrěž/0275
njezwotrěž/0275
njezwužitkuj/0279
podrěž/0275
pokaž/0275
pokřižuj/0279
pomaž/0275
pomó/0276
popleć/0274
powotewri/0278
powě/0277
póžri/0278
přecychnuj/0279
přediskutuj/0279
předrysuj/0279
přeforměruj/0279
překawpluj/0279
překupluj/0279
přelutuj/0279
přemó/0276
přeorientuj/0279
přepleć/0274
přepokaž/0275
přepoluj/0279
přeranžěruj/0279
přerěž/0275
přetelefoněruj/0279
přezwučuj/0279
přešuluj/0279
přikaž/0275
přimaršěruj/0279
připleć/0274
připochoduj/0279
připokaž/0275
připowě/0277
přirěž/0275
přišrubuj/0279
rozhałuzuj/0279
rozkaž/0275
rozmaž/0275
rozmjeć/0274
rozpjenkuj/0279
rozpleć/0274
rozpokaž/0275
rozrěž/0275
rozšnóruj/0279
spleć/0274
spóžri/0278
wobchłódkuj/0279
wobmaž/0275
wobodri/0278
wobrytuj/0279
wobrěž/0275
wobšudruj/0279
womaž/0275
wopleć/0274
wopokaž/0275
wopowě/0277
wotblenduj/0279
wotewri/0278
wotfrotěruj/0279
wothóčkuj/0279
wotkaž/0275
wotketluj/0279
wotkupluj/0279
wotmjeć/0274
wotmoluj/0279
wotpawsuj/0279
wotpleć/0274
wotpokaž/0275
wotpomó/0276
wotracionalizuj/0279
wotrychtuj/0279
wotrěž/0275
wottabuizuj/0279
wotšacuj/0279
wotštrykuj/0279
wočisłuj/0279
wucheckuj/0279
wuformuj/0279
wuhładkuj/0279
wukosuj/0279
wulotuj/0279
wumaž/0275
wumjeć/0274
wumustruj/0279
wumó/0276
wupleć/0274
wupokaž/0275
wupomó/0276
wupowě/0277
wuproběruj/0279
wuredluj/0279
wurěž/0275
wuspinkuj/0279
wuwikuj/0279
wučłonkuj/0279
wušuluj/0279
zabetoněruj/0279
zadibluj/0279
zagmejnuj/0279
zakabluj/0279
zakaž/0275
zaklučuj/0279
zaloguj/0279
zamaž/0275
zamontuj/0279
zapječatuj/0279
zapleć/0274
zapokaž/0275
zapowě/0277
zapłašćikuj/0279
zaryheluj/0279
zarěž/0275
zasortěruj/0279
zatyzkuj/0279
zawri/0278
zazygluj/0279
zašrótuj/0279
zešrotuj/0279
zmaž/0275
zmjeć/0274
změruj/0279
zrěž/0275
zwotrěž/0275
